Illinois, session 104th, HB5231.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7.5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-441 and 8104-457)9    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 10by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 11exempt from inspection and copying:12        (a) All information determined to be confidential 13    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 14    Development Act.15        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 16    library users with specific materials under the Library 17    Records Confidentiality Act.18        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 19    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 20    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 21    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 22    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 23    has received.  HB5231- 2 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 2    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 3    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 4    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 5    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 6    Infection Control Act.7        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 8    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.9        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 10    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 11    Qualifications Based Selection Act.12        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 13    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 14    Tuition Act.15        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 16    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 17    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 18    general's office that would be exempt if created or 19    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 20    that Act.21        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 22    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 23    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 24    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.25        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 26    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers   HB5231- 3 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.2        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 3    or driver identification information compiled by a law 4    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 5    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.6        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 7    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 8    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 9    Prevention Review Team Act.10        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 11    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 12    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 13    authorized under that Article.14        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 15    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 16    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 17    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 18    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 19    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 20    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.21        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 22    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 23    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.24        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 25    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 26    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the   HB5231- 4 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 2    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 3    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 4    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 5    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 6    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 7    Act (repealed). 8        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 9    Personnel Record Review Act. 10        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 11    Illinois School Student Records Act. 12        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 13    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 14        (t) (Blank). 15        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 16    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 17    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 18        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 19    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 20    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 21    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 22    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 23    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 24    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 25    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 26    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the   HB5231- 5 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 2        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 3    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 4    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.5        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 6    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 7    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.8        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 9    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 10    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 11        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 12    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 13    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 14    information about the identity and administrative finding 15    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 16    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 17    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 18    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 19        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 20    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 21    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 22    Act. 23        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 24    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 25        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 26    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.   HB5231- 6 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 2    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 3    authorized under that Act.4        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 5    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 6    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 7        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 8    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 9        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 10    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 11        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 12    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 13    Code. 14        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 15    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 16        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 17    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 18    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 19        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 20    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 21    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 22    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 23    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 24        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 25    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 26        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted   HB5231- 7 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 2    Aid Code. 3        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 5        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 6    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 7        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 8    arising out of a peer support counseling session 9    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 10    Suicide Prevention Act. 11        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 12    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 13    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 14    Prevention Act. 15        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 16    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 17    under the Reproductive Health Act. 18        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 19    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 20        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 21    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 22    Human Rights Act.23        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 24    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 25    Act. 26        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under   HB5231- 8 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 2        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 3    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 4    Public Aid Code. 5        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 6    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 7        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 8    information that shall not be made public under the 9    Illinois Insurance Code. 10        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 11    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.12        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 13    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 14        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 15    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 16        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 17    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 18    Police Act. 19        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 20    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 21    Administrative Code of Illinois. 22        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 23    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 24    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 25    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 26        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed   HB5231- 9 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 2    Violence Fatality Review Act. 3        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 4    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 5    information used and collected by the Illinois State 6    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 7    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 8    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 9    July 1, 2028.10        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 11    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 12    Agency Licensing Act. 13        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 14    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 15    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 16    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 17    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 18    Act. 19        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 20    the School Safety Drill Act. 21        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 22    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 23        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 24    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 25    Act. 26        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section   HB5231- 10 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    2-3.196 of the School Code. 2        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 3    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 4    Power Agency Act. 5        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 6    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 7    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 8        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 9    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 10        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 12        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 14        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 15    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 16    Modernization Act. 17        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 18    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.19        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 20    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 21    under that Section. 22        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 23    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.24(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 25103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 268-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592,   HB5231- 11 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 2103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 38-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 4eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 5104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; revised 69-10-25.) 7    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457 but 8before 104-441)9    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 10by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 11exempt from inspection and copying:12        (a) All information determined to be confidential 13    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 14    Development Act.15        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 16    library users with specific materials under the Library 17    Records Confidentiality Act.18        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 19    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 20    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 21    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 22    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 23    has received.24        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 25    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating   HB5231- 12 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 2    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 3    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 4    Infection Control Act.5        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 6    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.7        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 8    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 9    Qualifications Based Selection Act.10        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 12    Tuition Act.13        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 14    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 15    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 16    general's office that would be exempt if created or 17    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 18    that Act.19        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 20    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 21    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 22    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.23        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 24    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 25    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.26        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information   HB5231- 13 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    or driver identification information compiled by a law 2    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 3    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.4        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 5    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 6    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 7    Prevention Review Team Act.8        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 9    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 10    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 11    authorized under that Article.12        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 13    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 14    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 15    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 16    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 17    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 18    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.19        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 20    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 21    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.22        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 23    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 24    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 25    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 26    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the   HB5231- 14 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Northern 2    Illinois Transit Authority under Section 2.11 of the 3    Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, or the St. Clair 4    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 5    Act (repealed). 6        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 7    Personnel Record Review Act. 8        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 9    Illinois School Student Records Act. 10        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 12        (t) (Blank). 13        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 14    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 15    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 16        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 17    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 18    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 19    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 20    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 21    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 22    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 23    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 24    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 25    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 26        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification   HB5231- 15 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 2    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.3        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 4    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 5    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.6        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 7    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 8    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 9        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 10    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 11    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 12    information about the identity and administrative finding 13    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 14    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 15    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 16    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 17        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 18    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 19    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 20    Act. 21        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 22    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 23        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 24    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 25        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 26    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent   HB5231- 16 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    authorized under that Act.2        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 3    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 4    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 5        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 6    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 7        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 8    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 9        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 10    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 11    Code. 12        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 14        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 15    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 16    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 17        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 18    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 19    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 20    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 21    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 22        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 23    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 24        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 25    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 26    Aid Code.   HB5231- 17 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 2    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 3        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 5        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 6    arising out of a peer support counseling session 7    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 8    Suicide Prevention Act. 9        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 10    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 11    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 12    Prevention Act. 13        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 14    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 15    under the Reproductive Health Act. 16        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 17    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 18        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 19    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 20    Human Rights Act.21        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 22    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 23    Act. 24        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 26        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under   HB5231- 18 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 2    Public Aid Code. 3        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 5        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 6    information that shall not be made public under the 7    Illinois Insurance Code. 8        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 9    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.10        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 11    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 12        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 13    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 14        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 15    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 16    Police Act. 17        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 18    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 19    Administrative Code of Illinois. 20        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 21    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 22    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 23    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 24        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 25    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 26    Violence Fatality Review Act.   HB5231- 19 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 2    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 3    information used and collected by the Illinois State 4    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 5    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 6    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 7    July 1, 2028.8        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 9    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 10    Agency Licensing Act. 11        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 12    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 13    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 14    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 15    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 16    Act. 17        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 18    the School Safety Drill Act. 19        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 20    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 21        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 22    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 23    Act. 24        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 25    2-3.196 of the School Code. 26        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed   HB5231- 20 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 2    Power Agency Act. 3        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 4    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 5    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 6        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 7    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 8        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 9    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 10        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 12        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 13    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 14    Modernization Act. 15        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 16    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.17        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 18    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 19    under that Section. 20        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 21    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.22(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 23103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 248-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 25eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 26103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff.   HB5231- 21 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b18-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 2eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 3104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; 104-457, eff. 46-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 5    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-441)6    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 7by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 8exempt from inspection and copying:9        (a) All information determined to be confidential 10    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 11    Development Act.12        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 13    library users with specific materials under the Library 14    Records Confidentiality Act.15        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 16    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 17    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 18    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 19    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 20    has received.21        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 22    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 23    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 24    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 25    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted   HB5231- 22 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    Infection Control Act.2        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 3    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.4        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 5    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 6    Qualifications Based Selection Act.7        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 8    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 9    Tuition Act.10        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 11    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 12    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 13    general's office that would be exempt if created or 14    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 15    that Act.16        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 17    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 18    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 19    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.20        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 21    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 22    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.23        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 24    or driver identification information compiled by a law 25    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 26    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.  HB5231- 23 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 2    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 3    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 4    Prevention Review Team Act.5        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 6    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 7    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 8    authorized under that Article.9        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 10    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 11    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 12    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 13    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 14    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 15    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.16        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 17    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 18    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.19        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 20    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 21    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 22    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 23    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 24    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Northern 25    Illinois Transit Authority under Section 2.11 of the 26    Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, or the St. Clair   HB5231- 24 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 2    Act (repealed). 3        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 4    Personnel Record Review Act. 5        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 6    Illinois School Student Records Act. 7        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 8    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 9        (t) (Blank). 10        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 11    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 12    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 13        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 14    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 15    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 16    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 17    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 18    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 19    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 20    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 21    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 22    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 23        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 24    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 25    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.26        (w) Personally identifiable information which is   HB5231- 25 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 2    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.3        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 4    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 5    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 6        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 7    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 8    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 9    information about the identity and administrative finding 10    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 11    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 12    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 13    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 14        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 15    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 16    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 17    Act. 18        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 19    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 20        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 21    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 22        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 23    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 24    authorized under that Act.25        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 26    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common   HB5231- 26 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 2        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 3    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 4        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 5    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 6        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 7    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 8    Code. 9        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 10    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 11        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 12    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 13    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 14        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 15    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 16    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 17    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 18    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 19        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 20    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 21        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 22    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 23    Aid Code. 24        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 26        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under   HB5231- 27 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 2        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 3    arising out of a peer support counseling session 4    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 5    Suicide Prevention Act. 6        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 7    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 8    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 9    Prevention Act. 10        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 11    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 12    under the Reproductive Health Act. 13        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 14    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 15        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 16    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 17    Human Rights Act.18        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 19    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 20    Act. 21        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 22    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 23        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 24    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 25    Public Aid Code. 26        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under   HB5231- 28 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 2        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 3    information that shall not be made public under the 4    Illinois Insurance Code. 5        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 6    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.7        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 8    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 9        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 10    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 11        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 12    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 13    Police Act. 14        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 15    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 16    Administrative Code of Illinois. 17        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 18    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 19    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 20    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 21        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 22    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 23    Violence Fatality Review Act. 24        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 25    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 26    information used and collected by the Illinois State   HB5231- 29 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 2    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 3    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 4    July 1, 2028.5        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 6    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 7    Agency Licensing Act. 8        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 9    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 10    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 11    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 12    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 13    Act. 14        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 15    the School Safety Drill Act. 16        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 17    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 18        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 19    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 20    Act. 21        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 22    2-3.196 of the School Code. 23        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 24    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 25    Power Agency Act. 26        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce   HB5231- 30 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 2    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 3        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 4    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 5        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 6    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 7        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 8    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 9        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 10    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 11    Modernization Act. 12        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 13    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.14        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 15    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 16    under that Section. 17        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 18    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.19        (vvv) (uuu) Information exempt from disclosure under 20    Section 70 of the End-of-Life Options for Terminally Ill 21    Patients Act.22        (www) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 23    2-131 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 24(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 25103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 268-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592,   HB5231- 31 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 2103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 38-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 4eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 5104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; 104-441, eff. 69-12-26; 104-457, eff. 6-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 7    Section 10. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 8Section 2-131 as follows: 9    (625 ILCS 5/2-131 new)10    Sec. 2-131. Use of automatic license plate recognition 11systems by law enforcement agencies. 12    (a) For purposes of this Section:13    "Audit trail" means all records of queries and responses 14in an automatic license plate reader, and all records of 15actions in which system data is accessed, entered, updated, 16shared, or disseminated, including the:17        (1) date and time of access;18        (2) license plate number or other data elements used 19    to query the system;20        (3) specific purpose, as set forth in subsection (d), 21    for accessing or querying the system, including the 22    offense type for any criminal investigation;23        (4) associated call for service or case number; and24        (5) username of the person or persons who accessed or   HB5231- 32 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    queried the system.2    "Audit trail data" means all forms of data collected or 3generated by an automatic license plate reader for purposes of 4producing an audit trail.5    "Automatic license plate reader" or "ALPR" has the meaning 6given to that term in subsection (a) of Section 2-130.7    "ALPR information" has the meaning given to that term in 8subsection (a) of Section 2-130.9    "ALPR systems" has the meaning given to that term in 10subsection (a) of Section 2-130.11    "Chief Procurement Office" means the Chief Procurement 12Office for General Services in the Chief Procurement Office.13    "Law enforcement agency" means any entity with statutory 14police powers and the ability to employ individuals authorized 15to make arrests. "Law enforcement agency" does not include the 16Illinois State Police. "Law enforcement agency" includes any 17university, college, or community college.18    "Notification" means an alert from an automatic license 19plate reader that a license plate or vehicle matches a license 20plate or vehicle in a database used by the automatic license 21plate reader for comparison purposes.22    "Person associated with human trafficking" means a person 23who is either a suspected victim or an alleged perpetrator of 24either commercial sex trafficking or labor trafficking.25    "Publicly post" means to post on a website that is 26maintained by the law enforcement agency or on any other   HB5231- 33 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1website on which the law enforcement agency generally posts 2information and that is available to the public or that 3clearly describes how the public may access the information.4    "Query" means a search of ALPR information based on 5information entered by the user, including a full or partial 6license plate number, any identifying characteristics of a 7vehicle, the date, time, or location of an image, or any other 8data that is searchable within the ALPR systems.9    "System data" means all forms of data collected or 10generated by ALPR systems, including images of license plates, 11vehicles, any identifying characteristics of vehicles, the 12date, time, and location of an image, and any peripheral 13images collected from which analytical data may be extracted.14    "Vendor" means a business, company, corporation, or other 15nongovernmental entity that contracts with a law enforcement 16agency for the installation, use, or maintenance of ALPR 17systems.18    (b) Pursuant to the Illinois Procurement Code, the Chief 19Procurement Office for General Services shall determine the 20automatic license plate readers and ALPR systems for use in 21the State in accordance with this Section. ALPR systems shall 22not be approved by the Chief Procurement Office for use by a 23law enforcement agency unless:24        (1) the vendor certifies that it will not sell or 25    share any system data or audit trail data gathered in the 26    State, except upon request of the contracting law   HB5231- 34 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    enforcement agency for a purpose set forth in subsection 2    (f), and will only access system data or audit trail data 3    upon request of the contracting law enforcement agency for 4    maintenance and quality assurance purposes;5        (2) the vendor certifies that its ALPR systems is 6    capable of purging system data collected or generated in 7    the State after 21 days of the date of its capture, or 8    earlier if requested by the contracting law enforcement 9    agency, in such a manner that the system data is destroyed 10    and not recoverable by either the vendor or the 11    contracting law enforcement agency;12        (3) the vendor certifies that its ALPR systems is 13    capable of producing an audit trail and purging audit 14    trail data collected or generated in the State after 2 15    years of the date of its capture in such a manner that the 16    audit trail data is destroyed and not recoverable by 17    either the vendor or the contracting law enforcement 18    agency;19        (4) the databases used by the ALPR systems to provide 20    notifications as set forth in subsection (d) are updated 21    at least every 24 hours, or as soon as practicable after 22    the updates become available; and23        (5) the ALPR systems meets information security 24    standards as established by the Department of Innovation 25    and Technology.26    (c) A law enforcement agency may enter into a contract   HB5231- 35 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1with a vendor for the installation, use, or maintenance of 2ALPR systems approved by the Chief Procurement Office. The 3contract shall specify that system data and audit trail data 4will be the property of the law enforcement agency and that the 5ALPR systems meets the requirements set forth in subsection 6(b). The contract shall further specify that the vendor will 7immediately notify the law enforcement agency upon receipt of 8any subpoena duces tecum, execution of any search warrant, or 9any other request from a third party for the system data or 10audit trail data, unless disclosure of the subpoena duces 11tecum, search warrant, or request is otherwise prohibited by 12law.13    (d) A law enforcement agency may use ALPR systems only:14        (1) as part of a criminal investigation into an 15    alleged violation of State law or any ordinance of any 16    county, city, or town where there is a reasonable 17    suspicion that a crime was committed;18        (2) as part of an active investigation related to a 19    missing or endangered person, including whether to issue 20    an alert for the person, or a person associated with human 21    trafficking; or22        (3) to receive notifications related to a missing or 23    endangered person, a person with an outstanding warrant, a 24    person associated with human trafficking, a stolen 25    vehicle, or a stolen license plate.26    All information necessary for the creation of an audit   HB5231- 36 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1trail shall be entered in order to query system data. A law 2enforcement agency shall not query or download system data 3unless the system data is related to at least one of the 4purposes under this subsection. A law enforcement agency may 5download audit trail data for purposes of generating audit 6reports. A stop of a motor vehicle based on a notification from 7the ALPR systems shall be consistent with subsection (m).8    (e) System data shall be purged after 21 days of the date 9of its capture in such a manner that the system data is 10destroyed and not recoverable by either the vendor or the law 11enforcement agency. Audit trail data shall be purged after 2 12years of the date of its capture in such a manner that the 13audit trail data is destroyed and not recoverable by either 14the vendor or the law enforcement agency. However, if the 15system data or audit trail data is part of an ongoing 16investigation, prosecution, or civil action, such data shall 17be retained by the law enforcement agency until (i) the 18investigation concludes without any criminal charges or (ii) 19the final disposition of any criminal or civil matter related 20to the data, including any direct appeals and any writs of 21habeas corpus or federal law, in accordance with applicable 22records retention law and policy.23    (f) System data and audit trail data shall not be subject 24to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act. A law 25enforcement agency shall not sell any system data or audit 26trail data. A law enforcement agency shall not share system   HB5231- 37 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1data or audit trail data with, or disseminate system data or 2audit trail data to, any database of any other State, federal, 3private, or commercial entity. A law enforcement agency may 4share system data or audit trail data for the following 5purposes:6        (1) with another law enforcement agency for purposes 7    set forth in subsection (d), which may include allowing 8    another law enforcement agency to query system data, as 9    long as the law enforcement agency receiving the system 10    data complies with all of the provisions of this Section;11        (2) with a State's Attorney for purposes set forth in 12    subsection (d) or for complying with discovery or a court 13    order in a criminal proceeding;14        (3) with a defendant or the defendant's counsel for 15    purposes of complying with discovery or a court order in a 16    criminal proceeding;17        (4) pursuant to a court order or a court-issued 18    subpoena duces tecum in any criminal or civil proceeding;19        (5) with the vendor for maintenance or quality 20    assurance purposes; or21        (6) to alert the public to an emergency situation, a 22    missing or endangered person, a person associated with 23    human trafficking, or a person with an outstanding 24    warrant.25    In addition, the Illinois State Police shall share system 26data obtained from any ALPR systems installed, maintained, and   HB5231- 38 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1operated on any limited access highway or any bridge, tunnel, 2or special structure under the jurisdiction of the Department 3of Transportation with any law enforcement agency in the 4locality where the ALPR systems is installed, maintained, or 5operated, and the law enforcement agency may share such system 6data for the purposes set forth in this subsection.7    (g) A law enforcement agency that uses ALPR systems shall 8maintain records sufficient to facilitate public reporting as 9required by this Section, the production of an audit trail, 10and discovery in criminal and civil proceedings, appeals, and 11post-conviction proceedings.12    (h) A law enforcement agency that uses ALPR systems shall 13establish a policy governing its use that is consistent with 14this Section that includes:15        (1) training requirements for individuals who will use 16    or access the ALPR systems;17        (2) the purposes for which the ALPR systems may be 18    used or accessed;19        (3) procedures to ensure that the databases used by 20    the ALPR systems to provide notifications as set forth in 21    subsection (d) are updated at least every 24 hours, or as 22    soon as practicable after the updates become available;23        (4) procedures to confirm the accuracy of any 24    notifications made by the ALPR systems before stopping a 25    vehicle that are consistent with subsection (m);26        (5) a prohibition against downloading system data that   HB5231- 39 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    is not related to at least one of the purposes set forth in 2    subsection (d), except for downloads of audit trail data 3    for purposes of generating audit reports;4        (6) an internal auditing procedure that occurs at 5    least once every 30 days;6        (7) procedures for the retention and destruction of 7    system data and audit trail data that are consistent with 8    subsection (e);9        (8) a prohibition on the sale of system data and audit 10    trail data and restrictions on the sharing of system data 11    and audit trail data that are consistent with subsection 12    (f); and13        (9) security procedures to protect the ALPR systems, 14    system data, and audit trail data from unauthorized 15    access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.16    (i) A law enforcement agency that uses ALPR systems shall 17report to the Illinois State Police by April 1 of each year, in 18a format to be determined by the Illinois State Police, on its 19use of the ALPR systems during the preceding calendar year, 20which shall include the following data:21        (1) the total number of cameras owned or leased by an 22    agency as part of ALPR systems at the conclusion of each 23    calendar year, including the number of the cameras 24    designed to be affixed inside or on a motor vehicle, 25    permanently affixed adjacent to a highway, or temporarily 26    affixed or placed adjacent to a highway for purposes of   HB5231- 40 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    capturing system data;2        (2) a list of all State and federal databases with 3    which the system data was compared, unless the existence 4    of any the database itself is not public;5        (3) the total number of times the ALPR systems was 6    queried, including the specific purposes of the queries, 7    as set forth in subsection (d), and the offense types for 8    any criminal investigation;9        (4) the race, ethnicity, age, and gender of any 10    individual identified as a suspect and charged with a 11    criminal offense as a result of a query of the ALPR systems 12    as part of a criminal investigation;13        (5) the number of motor vehicles stopped based on 14    notifications from the ALPR systems, including the 15    specific reasons for the notifications as set forth in 16    subsection (d);17        (6) the race, ethnicity, age, and gender of the driver 18    of any motor vehicle stopped based on a notification from 19    the ALPR systems;20        (7) whether the law enforcement agency allows any 21    other law enforcement agency to access its system data, 22    and if so, which other law enforcement agency has been 23    granted access;24        (8) the number of identified instances of unauthorized 25    use of or access to the ALPR systems, including the nature 26    and circumstances of any instances; and  HB5231- 41 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1        (9) the number of subpoena duces tecum, search 2    warrants, and any other requests received from a third 3    party for system data or audit trail data, including the 4    identity of the entity that requested the issuance of the 5    subpoena duces tecum, executed the search warrant, or 6    requested system data or audit trail data, and whether any 7    system data or audit trail data was provided to the 8    entity, unless disclosure of the subpoena duces tecum, 9    search warrant, or request is otherwise prohibited by law.10    (j) The Illinois State Police shall aggregate the data 11provided pursuant to subsection (i) and report it to the 12Governor, the General Assembly, and the Illinois Criminal 13Justice Information Authority by July 1 of each year.14    (k) A law enforcement agency that uses ALPR systems shall 15publicly post the policy set forth in subsection (h) and the 16report set forth in subsection (i). Data shall not be publicly 17posted if it contains personal or case identifying 18information. If any data (i) contains an articulable concern 19for any person's safety, (ii) is otherwise prohibited from 20public disclosure by federal or State statute, or (iii) may 21compromise sensitive criminal justice information if 22disclosed, the data may be excluded from being publicly 23posted.24    (l) A law enforcement agency shall not use ALPR systems 25for the purpose of interfering with individuals engaged in 26lawful activities or tracking individuals on the basis of the   HB5231- 42 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1content of lawfully protected speech, along with the 2prohibitions set forth in subsection (b) of Section 2-130.3    (m) A notification by ALPR systems for purposes set forth 4in subsection (d) does not, by itself, constitute reasonable 5suspicion as grounds for a law enforcement agency to stop a 6vehicle. Prior to stopping a vehicle based on a notification, 7a law enforcement officer shall:8        (1) develop independent reasonable suspicion for the 9    stop; or10        (2) confirm that the license plate or identifying 11    characteristics of a vehicle match the information 12    contained in the database used to generate the 13    notification.14    (n) Any person who willfully and intentionally queries, 15accesses, or uses ALPR systems for a purpose other than set 16forth in subsection (d), or who willfully and intentionally 17sells, shares, or disseminates system data or audit trail data 18in violation of subsection (f), is guilty of a Class 1 19misdemeanor.20    (o) Any evidence obtained as the result of a violation of 21subsection (d), (f), (l), or (m) is not admissible by the State 22in any criminal or civil proceeding, but the evidence may be 23admitted by a defendant in a criminal proceeding or a 24litigant, other than the State, in a civil proceeding.25    (p) This Section does not apply to ALPR systems used:26        (1) for the enforcement of traffic laws, which   HB5231- 43 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1    includes parking regulations, speed limits, tolling 2    requirements, high-occupancy vehicle requirements, or 3    on-road emissions monitoring;4        (2) by the Department of Transportation at permanent 5    weighing stations and in mobile weighing operations; or6        (3) by any State or local agency or any private entity 7    for non-criminal justice purposes.8    (q) A vendor shall immediately notify the contracting law 9enforcement agency under subsection (c) upon receipt of a 10subpoena duces tecum, execution of a search warrant, or any 11other request from a third party for any system data or audit 12trail data, unless disclosure of the subpoena duces tecum, 13search warrant, or request is otherwise prohibited by law.14    (r) Prior to or coincident with the implementation of ALPR 15systems, a law enforcement agency shall take measures to 16promote public awareness on the use of ALPR systems. 17    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 18changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 19that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 20represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 21not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 22made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 23Public Act.  HB5231- 44 -LRB104 18194 LNS 31633 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    5 ILCS 140/7.54    625 ILCS 5/2-131 new